Utah statutes.
78B-6-503.   Private property which may be taken.
Private property which may be taken under this part includes:
(1)  all real property belonging to any person;
(2)  lands belonging to the state, or to any county, city or incorporated
town, not appropriated to some public use;
(3)  property appropriated to public use; provided that the property may not
be taken unless for a more necessary public use than that to which it has
already been appropriated;
(4)  franchises for toll roads, toll bridges, ferries, and all other
franchises; provided that the franchises may not be taken unless for free
highways, railroads, or other more necessary public use;
(5)  all rights of way for any and all purposes mentioned in Section 78B-6-501
hereof, and any and all structures and improvements on the property, and the
lands held or used in connection with the property, shall be subject to be
connected with, crossed, or intersected by any other right of way or
improvement or structure; they shall also be subject to a limited use in
common with the owners, when necessary; but uses of crossings, intersections,
and connections shall be made in the manner most compatible with the greatest
public benefit and the least private injury; and
(6)  all classes of private property not enumerated if the taking is
authorized by law.
